Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.080

State historical societies—Appointment of directors—Removal.

The governing board of each state historical society shall appoint its respective director with the consent of the governor. The governor may remove a director for cause or if a majority of the society's governing board votes for removal.

[ 1983 c 91 s 8.]